Hawaii, session 2026, HB2305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that proper nutrition has been shown to reduce the frequency and severity of chronic diseases in the United States. The legislature also finds that nutrition and metabolic health education provides essential knowledge that demonstrates the connection between dietary habits and physical and mental well-being. The legislature further finds that the continuing medical education curriculum for physicians should include training in nutrition and metabolic health. Continuing medical education serves to improve, develop, and expand physician knowledge, skill, and performance to support high-quality medical care.  Requiring physicians to receive better education in nutrition and metabolic health will equip them with a stronger understanding of dietary principles and metabolic function, enabling them to offer informed recommendations that help prevent and manage chronic diseases. The purpose of this Act is to amend the continuing medical education requirements for physicians to include at least one hour of nutrition and metabolic health education. SECTION 2. Section 453-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) A physician, osteopathic physician, or surgeon shall meet the category 1 or 1A continuing medical education requirements by obtaining credit hours in a category 1 or 1A continuing medical education program accredited by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association or in other approved category 1 or 1A continuing medical education as provided in the board's rules[.]; provided that one hour of continuing medical education shall be on nutrition and metabolic health.  To determine compliance, the board may conduct a random audit.  A physician, osteopathic physician, or surgeon selected for audit shall be notified by the board.  Within sixty days of notification, the physician, osteopathic physician, or surgeon shall provide to the board documentation to verify compliance with the category 1 or 1A continuing medical education requirements." SECTION 3. No later than December 31, 2026, the Hawaii medical board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to implement section 2 of this Act. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000; provided that section 2 of this Act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.